Hawaii statutes.
§652-6 Same. Section 652-5 shall
extend to successive persons and to the State or any political or municipal
subdivision thereof, other than the original garnishee, employing the judgment
debtor, until the judgment debt has been fully discharged. [L 1915, c 64, §2;
am L 1919, c 161, §2; am L 1921, c 66, §1; RL 1925, §2831; am L 1927, c 96, §6;
am L 1933, c 171, §3; RL 1935, §4275; RL 1945, §10306; RL 1955, §237-6; HRS
§652-6]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next